Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-140
Hall.

The county of Hall is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township nine, north, of range twelve, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township nine, north, of range nine, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township twelve, north, of range nine, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township twelve, north, of range twelve, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 25, p. 217;

R.S.1913, § 853;

C.S.1922, § 755;

C.S.1929, § 25-142;

R.S.1943, § 22-140.